Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.065

Duties of board.

The board shall:

(1) Determine the qualifications of persons applying for licensure under this chapter;

(2) Prescribe, administer, and determine the requirements for examinations under this chapter and establish a passing grade for licensure under this chapter;

(3) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

(4) Have authority to provide requirements for continuing competency as a condition of license renewal by rule; and

(5) Evaluate and approve those schools from which graduation is accepted as proof of an applicant's completion of coursework requirements for licensure.

[ 2013 c 171 s 2; 2002 c 160 s 5.]